Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-105] International application of
chapter. (a) A court of this State shall treat a foreign country as if it
were a state of the United States for the purpose of applying parts I and II.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(c), a child-custody determination made in a foreign country under factual
circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of
this chapter shall be recognized and enforced under part III.

(c) A court of this State need not apply this
chapter if the child-custody law of a foreign country violates fundamental
principles of human rights. [L 2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next